Utah statutes.
58-54-4.   License required.
(1)  An individual may not engage in the practice of radiologic technology
unless licensed or exempted from licensure under this chapter.
(2)  The division shall issue to persons qualified under this chapter a
license in the classification of radiology technologist or radiology practical
technician.
(3)  A license shall be issued without regard to any area of practice
specialty as a radiology technologist.  A license for a radiology practical
technician may be issued certifying the practical technician for a specialty
type or limited practice.
